Ohio, session 136, HB336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 2929.18 be amended and section 10
2125.05 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 11
Sec. 2125.05. (A) In addition to compensatory damages, a 12
court may award child maintenance in a civil action for wrongful 13
death in a case in which both of the following apply: 14
(1) The wrongful death is found to have been proximately 15
caused by the deceased defendant's felony violation of division 16
(A)(1) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code. 17
(2) At the time of death, the deceased victim was the 18

H. B. No. 336 Page 2
As Introduced
parent of at least one surviving minor child. 19
(B) For each minor child of the victim, the court may 20
order the payment of child maintenance until the child reaches 21
eighteen years of age. 22
(C) The court shall calculate the amount of child 23
maintenance in accordance with the basic child support schedule, 24
the applicable worksheet, and the other provisions of Chapter 25
3119. of the Revised Code as if the deceased defendant were a 26
parent subject to a child support order under that chapter. 27
(D) The court shall order that child maintenance payments 28
be made from the defendant's estate to the clerk of courts as 29
trustee for remittance to the child's surviving parent. The 30
clerk shall remit the payments to the surviving parent within 31
three business days of receipt by the clerk. The clerk shall 32
deposit all payments not later than the next business day after 33
receipt. 34
(E) For purposes of this section, "parent" includes a 35
legal custodian or guardian of a child. 36
Sec. 2929.18. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this 37
division and in addition to imposing court costs pursuant to 38
section 2947.23 of the Revised Code, the court imposing a 39
sentence upon an offender for a felony may sentence the offender 40
to any financial sanction or combination of financial sanctions 41
authorized under this section or, in the circumstances specified 42
in section 2929.32 of the Revised Code, may impose upon the 43
offender a fine in accordance with that section, and shall 44
sentence the offender to make restitution pursuant to this 45
section and section 2929.281 of the Revised Code. The victim has 46
a right not to seek restitution. Financial However, the court 47

H. B. No. 336 Page 3
As Introduced
shall order the financial sanction specified in division (A)(2) 48
of this section, if applicable, in addition to any other 49
financial sanction or combination of financial sanctions imposed 50
under this section. Subject to division (A)(2) of this section, 51
financial sanctions that either are required to be or may be 52
imposed pursuant to this section include, but are not limited 53
to, the following: 54
(1) Restitution by the offender to the victim of the 55
offender's criminal offense or the victim's estate, in an amount 56
based on the victim's economic loss. In open court, the court 57
shall order that full restitution be made to the victim, to the 58
adult probation department that serves the county on behalf of 59
the victim, to the clerk of courts, or to another agency 60
designated by the court. At sentencing, the court shall 61
determine the amount of restitution to be made by the offender. 62
The victim, victim's representative, victim's attorney, if 63
applicable, the prosecutor or the prosecutor's designee, and the 64
offender may provide information relevant to the determination 65
of the amount of restitution. The amount the court orders as 66
restitution shall not exceed the amount of the economic loss 67
suffered by the victim as a direct and proximate result of the 68
commission of the offense. If the court imposes restitution for 69
the cost of accounting or auditing done to determine the extent 70
of economic loss, the court may order restitution for any amount 71
of the victim's costs of accounting or auditing provided that 72
the amount of restitution is reasonable and does not exceed the 73
value of property or services stolen or damaged as a result of 74
the offense. The court shall hold a hearing on restitution if 75
the offender, victim, victim's representative, or victim's 76
estate disputes the amount. The court shall determine the amount 77
of full restitution by a preponderance of the evidence. All 78

H. B. No. 336 Page 4
As Introduced
restitution payments shall be credited against any recovery of 79
economic loss in a civil action brought by the victim or the 80
victim's estate against the offender. 81
The court may order that the offender pay a surcharge of 82
not more than five per cent of the amount of the restitution 83
otherwise ordered to the entity responsible for collecting and 84
processing restitution payments. 85
The victim, victim's estate, or victim's attorney, if 86
applicable, may file a motion or request that the prosecutor in 87
the case file a motion, or the offender may file a motion, for 88
modification of the payment terms of any restitution ordered. If 89
the court grants the motion, it may modify the payment terms as 90
it determines appropriate but shall not reduce the amount of 91
restitution ordered, except as provided in division (A) of 92
section 2929.281 of the Revised Code. The court shall not 93
discharge restitution until it is fully paid by the offender. 94
(2) Except (2)(a) For any felony violation of division (A) 95
(1) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code, the court shall 96
order restitution in the form of child maintenance if the 97
offender was convicted of or pleaded guilty to that violation 98
and at the time of the offense the deceased victim was the 99
parent, legal custodian, or guardian of at least one surviving 100
minor child. For each minor child of the victim, the offender 101
shall pay child maintenance until the child reaches eighteen 102
years of age. 103
(b) The court shall calculate the amount of child 104
maintenance in accordance with the basic child support schedule, 105
the applicable worksheet, and the other provisions of Chapter 106
3119. of the Revised Code as if the offender were a parent 107
subject to a child support order under that chapter. 108

H. B. No. 336 Page 5
As Introduced
(c) The court shall order that child maintenance payments 109
be made to the clerk of courts as trustee for remittance to the 110
child's surviving parent, legal custodian, or guardian. The 111
clerk shall remit the payments to the surviving parent, legal 112
custodian, or guardian within three business days of receipt by 113
the clerk. The clerk shall deposit all payments not later than 114
the next business day after receipt. 115
(d) If the offender is ordered to pay child maintenance 116
under this section and is incarcerated and unable to pay the 117
required child maintenance, the offender shall have not more 118
than one year after the release from incarceration to begin 119
payment and shall enter a payment plan with the court to address 120
any arrearage. If the child maintenance payments are set to 121
terminate but the offender's obligation is not paid in full, the 122
child maintenance payments shall continue until the entire 123
arrearage is paid. 124
(e) If a parent, legal guardian, or custodian brings a 125
civil action against the offender prior to the ordering of child 126
maintenance under this section and obtains a judgment covering 127
the costs of child maintenance in the civil action, no child 128
maintenance shall be ordered under this section. 129
(f) If an offender is ordered to pay child maintenance 130
under this section and a parent, legal guardian, or custodian 131
subsequently brings a civil action against the offender and 132
obtains a civil judgment covering the costs of child 133
maintenance, the amount of restitution in the form of child 134
maintenance shall be reduced by the amount of the judgment 135
awarded in the civil action. 136
(3) Except as provided in division (B)(1), (3), or (4) of 137
this section, a fine payable by the offender to the state, to a 138

H. B. No. 336 Page 6
As Introduced
political subdivision, or as described in division (B)(2) of 139
this section to one or more law enforcement agencies, with the 140
amount of the fine based on a standard percentage of the 141
offender's daily income over a period of time determined by the 142
court and based upon the seriousness of the offense. A fine 143
ordered under this division shall not exceed the maximum 144
conventional fine amount authorized for the level of the offense 145
under division (A)(3) (A)(4) of this section. 146
(3) (4) Except as provided in division (B)(1), (3), or (4) 147
of this section, a fine payable by the offender to the state, to 148
a political subdivision when appropriate for a felony, or as 149
described in division (B)(2) of this section to one or more law 150
enforcement agencies, in the following amount: 151
(a) For a felony of the first degree, not more than twenty 152
thousand dollars; 153
(b) For a felony of the second degree, not more than 154
fifteen thousand dollars; 155
(c) For a felony of the third degree, not more than ten 156
thousand dollars; 157
(d) For a felony of the fourth degree, not more than five 158
thousand dollars; 159
(e) For a felony of the fifth degree, not more than two 160
thousand five hundred dollars. 161
(4) (5) A state fine or costs as defined in section 162
2949.111 of the Revised Code. 163
(5)(a) (6)(a) Reimbursement by the offender of any or all 164
of the costs of sanctions incurred by the government, including 165
the following: 166

H. B. No. 336 Page 7
As Introduced
(i) All or part of the costs of implementing any community 167
control sanction, including a supervision fee under section 168
2951.021 of the Revised Code; 169
(ii) All or part of the costs of confinement under a 170
sanction imposed pursuant to section 2929.14, 2929.142, or 171
2929.16 of the Revised Code, provided that the amount of 172
reimbursement ordered under this division shall not exceed the 173
total amount of reimbursement the offender is able to pay as 174
determined at a hearing and shall not exceed the actual cost of 175
the confinement; 176
(iii) All or part of the cost of purchasing and using an 177
immobilizing or disabling device, including a certified ignition 178
interlock device, or a remote alcohol monitoring device that a 179
court orders an offender to use under section 4510.13 of the 180
Revised Code. 181
(b) If the offender is sentenced to a sanction of 182
confinement pursuant to section 2929.14 or 2929.16 of the 183
Revised Code that is to be served in a facility operated by a 184
board of county commissioners, a legislative authority of a 185
municipal corporation, or another local governmental entity, if, 186
pursuant to section 307.93, 341.14, 341.19, 341.23, 753.02, 187
753.04, 753.16, 2301.56, or 2947.19 of the Revised Code and 188
section 2929.37 of the Revised Code, the board, legislative 189
authority, or other local governmental entity requires prisoners 190
to reimburse the county, municipal corporation, or other entity 191
for its expenses incurred by reason of the prisoner's 192
confinement, and if the court does not impose a financial 193
sanction under division (A)(5)(a)(ii) (A)(6)(a)(ii) of this 194
section, confinement costs may be assessed pursuant to section 195
2929.37 of the Revised Code. In addition, the offender may be 196

H. B. No. 336 Page 8
As Introduced
required to pay the fees specified in section 2929.38 of the 197
Revised Code in accordance with that section. 198
(c) Reimbursement by the offender for costs pursuant to 199
section 2929.71 of the Revised Code; 200
(d) Reimbursement by the offender for costs pursuant to 201
section 2917.321 of the Revised Code. 202
(B)(1) For a first, second, or third degree felony 203
violation of any provision of Chapter 2925., 3719., or 4729. of 204
the Revised Code, the sentencing court shall impose upon the 205
offender a mandatory fine of at least one-half of, but not more 206
than, the maximum statutory fine amount authorized for the level 207
of the offense pursuant to division (A)(3) (A)(4) of this 208
section. If an offender alleges in an affidavit filed with the 209
court prior to sentencing that the offender is indigent and 210
unable to pay the mandatory fine and if the court determines the 211
offender is an indigent person and is unable to pay the 212
mandatory fine described in this division, the court shall not 213
impose the mandatory fine upon the offender. 214
(2) Any mandatory fine imposed upon an offender under 215
division (B)(1) of this section and any fine imposed upon an 216
offender under division (A)(2) (A)(3) or (3) (4) of this section 217
for any fourth or fifth degree felony violation of any provision 218
of Chapter 2925., 3719., or 4729. of the Revised Code shall be 219
paid to law enforcement agencies pursuant to division (F) of 220
section 2925.03 of the Revised Code. 221
(3) For a fourth degree felony OVI offense and for a third 222
degree felony OVI offense, the sentencing court shall impose 223
upon the offender a mandatory fine in the amount specified in 224
division (G)(1)(d) or (e) of section 4511.19 of the Revised 225

H. B. No. 336 Page 9
As Introduced
Code, whichever is applicable. The mandatory fine so imposed 226
shall be disbursed as provided in the division pursuant to which 227
it is imposed. 228
(4) Notwithstanding any fine otherwise authorized or 229
required to be imposed under division (A)(2) (A)(3) or (3) (4) 230
or (B)(1) of this section or section 2929.31 of the Revised Code 231
for a violation of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code, in 232
addition to any penalty or sanction imposed for that offense 233
under section 2925.03 or sections 2929.11 to 2929.18 of the 234
Revised Code and in addition to the forfeiture of property in 235
connection with the offense as prescribed in Chapter 2981. of 236
the Revised Code, the court that sentences an offender for a 237
violation of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code may impose upon 238
the offender a fine in addition to any fine imposed under 239
division (A)(2) (A)(3) or (3) (4) of this section and in 240
addition to any mandatory fine imposed under division (B)(1) of 241
this section. The fine imposed under division (B)(4) of this 242
section shall be used as provided in division (H) of section 243
2925.03 of the Revised Code. A fine imposed under division (B) 244
(4) of this section shall not exceed whichever of the following 245
is applicable: 246
(a) The total value of any personal or real property in 247
which the offender has an interest and that was used in the 248
course of, intended for use in the course of, derived from, or 249
realized through conduct in violation of section 2925.03 of the 250
Revised Code, including any property that constitutes proceeds 251
derived from that offense; 252
(b) If the offender has no interest in any property of the 253
type described in division (B)(4)(a) of this section or if it is 254
not possible to ascertain whether the offender has an interest 255

H. B. No. 336 Page 10
As Introduced
in any property of that type in which the offender may have an 256
interest, the amount of the mandatory fine for the offense 257
imposed under division (B)(1) of this section or, if no 258
mandatory fine is imposed under division (B)(1) of this section, 259
the amount of the fine authorized for the level of the offense 260
imposed under division (A)(3) (A)(4) of this section. 261
(5) Prior to imposing a fine under division (B)(4) of this 262
section, the court shall determine whether the offender has an 263
interest in any property of the type described in division (B) 264
(4)(a) of this section. Except as provided in division (B)(6) or 265
(7) of this section, a fine that is authorized and imposed under 266
division (B)(4) of this section does not limit or affect the 267
imposition of the penalties and sanctions for a violation of 268
section 2925.03 of the Revised Code prescribed under those 269
sections or sections 2929.11 to 2929.18 of the Revised Code and 270
does not limit or affect a forfeiture of property in connection 271
with the offense as prescribed in Chapter 2981. of the Revised 272
Code. 273
(6) If the sum total of a mandatory fine amount imposed 274
for a first, second, or third degree felony violation of section 275
2925.03 of the Revised Code under division (B)(1) of this 276
section plus the amount of any fine imposed under division (B) 277
(4) of this section does not exceed the maximum statutory fine 278
amount authorized for the level of the offense under division 279
(A)(3) (A)(4) of this section or section 2929.31 of the Revised 280
Code, the court may impose a fine for the offense in addition to 281
the mandatory fine and the fine imposed under division (B)(4) of 282
this section. The sum total of the amounts of the mandatory 283
fine, the fine imposed under division (B)(4) of this section, 284
and the additional fine imposed under division (B)(6) of this 285
section shall not exceed the maximum statutory fine amount 286

H. B. No. 336 Page 11
As Introduced
authorized for the level of the offense under division (A)(3) 287
(A)(4) of this section or section 2929.31 of the Revised Code. 288
The clerk of the court shall pay any fine that is imposed under 289
division (B)(6) of this section to the county, township, 290
municipal corporation, park district as created pursuant to 291
section 511.18 or 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or state law 292
enforcement agencies in this state that primarily were 293
responsible for or involved in making the arrest of, and in 294
prosecuting, the offender pursuant to division (F) of section 295
2925.03 of the Revised Code. 296
(7) If the sum total of the amount of a mandatory fine 297
imposed for a first, second, or third degree felony violation of 298
section 2925.03 of the Revised Code plus the amount of any fine 299
imposed under division (B)(4) of this section exceeds the 300
maximum statutory fine amount authorized for the level of the 301
offense under division (A)(3) (A)(4) of this section or section 302
2929.31 of the Revised Code, the court shall not impose a fine 303
under division (B)(6) of this section. 304
(8)(a) If an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty 305
to a violation of section 2905.01, 2905.02, 2907.21, 2907.22, or 306
2923.32, division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2907.323 involving a 307
minor, or division (B)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of section 308
2919.22 of the Revised Code also is convicted of or pleads 309
guilty to a specification of the type described in section 310
2941.1422 of the Revised Code that charges that the offender 311
knowingly committed the offense in furtherance of human 312
trafficking, the sentencing court shall sentence the offender to 313
a financial sanction of restitution by the offender to the 314
victim or the victim's estate, with the restitution including 315
the costs of housing, counseling, and medical and legal 316
assistance incurred by the victim as a direct result of the 317

H. B. No. 336 Page 12
As Introduced
offense and the greater of the following: 318
(i) The gross income or value to the offender of the 319
victim's labor or services; 320
(ii) The value of the victim's labor as guaranteed under 321
the minimum wage and overtime provisions of the "Federal Fair 322
Labor Standards Act of 1938," 52 Stat. 1060, 20 U.S.C. 207, and 323
state labor laws. 324
(b) If a court imposing sentence upon an offender for a 325
felony is required to impose upon the offender a financial 326
sanction of restitution under division (B)(8)(a) of this 327
section, in addition to that financial sanction of restitution, 328
the court may sentence the offender to any other financial 329
sanction or combination of financial sanctions authorized under 330
this section, including a restitution sanction under division 331
(A)(1) of this section. 332
(9) In addition to any other fine that is or may be 333
imposed under this section, the court imposing sentence upon an 334
offender for a felony that is a sexually oriented offense or a 335
child-victim oriented offense, as those terms are defined in 336
section 2950.01 of the Revised Code, may impose a fine of not 337
less than fifty nor more than five hundred dollars. 338
(10) For a felony violation of division (A) of section 339
2921.321 of the Revised Code that results in the death of the 340
police dog or horse that is the subject of the violation, the 341
sentencing court shall impose upon the offender a mandatory fine 342
from the range of fines provided under division (A)(3) (A)(4) of 343
this section for a felony of the third degree. A mandatory fine 344
imposed upon an offender under division (B)(10) of this section 345
shall be paid to the law enforcement agency that was served by 346

H. B. No. 336 Page 13
As Introduced
the police dog or horse that was killed in the felony violation 347
of division (A) of section 2921.321 of the Revised Code to be 348
used as provided in division (E)(1)(b) of that section. 349
(11) In addition to any other fine that is or may be 350
imposed under this section, the court imposing sentence upon an 351
offender for any of the following offenses that is a felony may 352
impose a fine of not less than seventy nor more than five 353
hundred dollars, which, except as provided in division (B)(12) 354
of this section, shall be transmitted to the treasurer of state 355
to be credited to the address confidentiality program fund 356
created by section 111.48 of the Revised Code: 357
(a) Domestic violence; 358
(b) Menacing by stalking; 359
(c) Rape; 360
(d) Sexual battery; 361
(e) Trafficking in persons; 362
(f) A violation of section 2905.01, 2905.02, 2907.21, 363
2907.22, or 2923.32, division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2907.323 364
involving a minor, or division (B)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of 365
section 2919.22 of the Revised Code, if the offender also is 366
convicted of a specification of the type described in section 367
2941.1422 of the Revised Code that charges that the offender 368
knowingly committed the offense in furtherance of human 369
trafficking. 370
(12)(a) A court that imposes a fine under division (B)(11) 371
of this section may retain up to twenty-five per cent of amounts 372
collected in satisfaction of the fine to cover administrative 373
costs. 374

H. B. No. 336 Page 14
As Introduced
(b) A court that imposes a fine under division (B)(11) of 375
this section may assign up to twenty-five per cent of amounts 376
collected in satisfaction of the fine to reimburse the 377
prosecuting attorney for costs associated with prosecution of 378
the offense. 379
(C)(1) Except as provided in section 2951.021 of the 380
Revised Code, the offender shall pay reimbursements imposed upon 381
the offender pursuant to division (A)(5)(a) (A)(6)(a) of this 382
section to pay the costs incurred by a county pursuant to any 383
sanction imposed under this section or section 2929.16 or 384
2929.17 of the Revised Code or in operating a facility used to 385
confine offenders pursuant to a sanction imposed under section 386
2929.16 of the Revised Code to the county treasurer. The county 387
treasurer shall deposit the reimbursements in the sanction cost 388
reimbursement fund that each board of county commissioners shall 389
create in its county treasury. The county shall use the amounts 390
deposited in the fund to pay the costs incurred by the county 391
pursuant to any sanction imposed under this section or section 392
2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code or in operating a 393
facility used to confine offenders pursuant to a sanction 394
imposed under section 2929.16 of the Revised Code. 395
(2) Except as provided in section 2951.021 of the Revised 396
Code, the offender shall pay reimbursements imposed upon the 397
offender pursuant to division (A)(5)(a) (A)(6)(a) of this 398
section to pay the costs incurred by a municipal corporation 399
pursuant to any sanction imposed under this section or section 400
2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code or in operating a 401
facility used to confine offenders pursuant to a sanction 402
imposed under section 2929.16 of the Revised Code to the 403
treasurer of the municipal corporation. The treasurer shall 404
deposit the reimbursements in a special fund that shall be 405

H. B. No. 336 Page 15
As Introduced
established in the treasury of each municipal corporation. The 406
municipal corporation shall use the amounts deposited in the 407
fund to pay the costs incurred by the municipal corporation 408
pursuant to any sanction imposed under this section or section 409
2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised Code or in operating a 410
facility used to confine offenders pursuant to a sanction 411
imposed under section 2929.16 of the Revised Code. 412
(3) Except as provided in section 2951.021 of the Revised 413
Code, the offender shall pay reimbursements imposed pursuant to 414
division (A)(5)(a) (A)(6)(a) of this section for the costs 415
incurred by a private provider pursuant to a sanction imposed 416
under this section or section 2929.16 or 2929.17 of the Revised 417
Code to the provider. 418
(D) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a 419
financial sanction imposed pursuant to division (A) or (B) of 420
this section is a judgment in favor of the state or a political 421
subdivision in which the court that imposed the financial 422
sanction is located, and the offender subject to the financial 423
sanction is the judgment debtor. A financial sanction of 424
reimbursement imposed pursuant to division (A)(5)(a)(ii) (A)(6) 425
(a)(ii) of this section upon an offender who is incarcerated in 426
a state facility or a municipal jail is a judgment in favor of 427
the state or the municipal corporation, and the offender subject 428
to the financial sanction is the judgment debtor. A financial 429
sanction of reimbursement imposed upon an offender pursuant to 430
this section for costs incurred by a private provider of 431
sanctions is a judgment in favor of the private provider, and 432
the offender subject to the financial sanction is the judgment 433
debtor. A financial sanction of a mandatory fine imposed under 434
division (B)(10) of this section that is required under that 435
division to be paid to a law enforcement agency is a judgment in 436

H. B. No. 336 Page 16
As Introduced
favor of the specified law enforcement agency, and the offender 437
subject to the financial sanction is the judgment debtor. A 438
financial sanction of restitution imposed pursuant to division 439
(A)(1), (A)(2), or (B)(8) of this section is an order in favor 440
of the victim of the offender's criminal act or, with respect to 441
division (A)(2) of this section, in favor of the parent, legal 442
custodian, or guardian of a surviving minor child of the victim 443
of the offender's criminal act that can be collected through a 444
certificate of judgment as described in division (D)(1) of this 445
section, through execution as described in division (D)(2) of 446
this section, or through an order as described in division (D) 447
(3) of this section, and the offender shall be considered for 448
purposes of the collection as the judgment debtor. Imposition of 449
a financial sanction and execution on the judgment does not 450
preclude any other power of the court to impose or enforce 451
sanctions on the offender. Once the financial sanction is 452
imposed as a judgment or order under this division, the victim, 453
or parent, legal custodian, or guardian of a surviving minor 454
child of the victim if division (A)(2) of this section applies, 455
private provider, state, or political subdivision may do any of 456
the following: 457
(1) Obtain from the clerk of the court in which the 458
judgment was entered, at no cost, a certificate of judgment that 459
shall be in the same manner and form as a certificate of 460
judgment issued in a civil action; 461
(2) Obtain execution of the judgment or order through any 462
available procedure, including: 463
(a) An execution against the property of the judgment 464
debtor under Chapter 2329. of the Revised Code; 465
(b) An execution against the person of the judgment debtor 466

H. B. No. 336 Page 17
As Introduced
under Chapter 2331. of the Revised Code; 467
(c) A proceeding in aid of execution under Chapter 2333. 468
of the Revised Code, including: 469
(i) A proceeding for the examination of the judgment 470
debtor under sections 2333.09 to 2333.12 and sections 2333.15 to 471
2333.27 of the Revised Code; 472
(ii) A proceeding for attachment of the person of the 473
judgment debtor under section 2333.28 of the Revised Code; 474
(iii) A creditor's suit under section 2333.01 of the 475
Revised Code. 476
(d) The attachment of the property of the judgment debtor 477
under Chapter 2715. of the Revised Code; 478
(e) The garnishment of the property of the judgment debtor 479
under Chapter 2716. of the Revised Code. 480
(3) Obtain an order for the assignment of wages of the 481
judgment debtor under section 1321.33 of the Revised Code. 482
(E) A court that imposes a financial sanction upon an 483
offender may hold a hearing if necessary to determine whether 484
the offender is able to pay the sanction or is likely in the 485
future to be able to pay it. 486
(F) Each Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) 487
of this section, each court imposing a financial sanction upon 488
an offender under this section or under section 2929.32 of the 489
Revised Code may designate the clerk of the court or another 490
person to collect the financial sanction. The clerk or other 491
person authorized by law or the court to collect the financial 492
sanction may enter into contracts with one or more public 493
agencies or private vendors for the collection of, amounts due 494

H. B. No. 336 Page 18
As Introduced
under the financial sanction imposed pursuant to this section or 495
section 2929.32 of the Revised Code. Before entering into a 496
contract for the collection of amounts due from an offender 497
pursuant to any financial sanction imposed pursuant to this 498
section or section 2929.32 of the Revised Code, a court shall 499
comply with sections 307.86 to 307.92 of the Revised Code. 500
(G) If a court that imposes a financial sanction under 501
division (A) or (B) of this section finds that an offender 502
satisfactorily has completed all other sanctions imposed upon 503
the offender and that all restitution that has been ordered has 504
been paid as ordered, the court may suspend any financial 505
sanctions imposed pursuant to this section or section 2929.32 of 506
the Revised Code that have not been paid. 507
(H) No financial sanction imposed under this section or 508
section 2929.32 of the Revised Code shall preclude a victim from 509
bringing a civil action against the offender. 510
(I) If the court imposes restitution, fines, fees, or 511
incarceration costs on a business or corporation, it is the duty 512
of the person authorized to make disbursements from the assets 513
of the business or corporation to pay the restitution, fines, 514
fees, or incarceration costs from those assets. 515
(J) If an offender is sentenced to pay restitution, a 516
fine, fee, or incarceration costs, the clerk of the sentencing 517
court, on request, shall make the offender's payment history 518
available to the prosecutor, victim, victim's representative, 519
victim's attorney, if applicable, the probation department, and 520
the court without cost. 521
Section 2. That existing section 2929.18 of the Revised 522
Code is hereby repealed. 523

H. B. No. 336 Page 19
As Introduced
Section 3. This act shall be known as the Sam Knisley 524
Family Support Act. 525